test/swedish.sbl
/*
Copyright (c) 2001-2006, Dr Martin Porter and Richard Boulton. All rights
reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
are met:
1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
   documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
3. Neither the name of the Snowball project nor the names of its contributors
   may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software
   without specific prior written permission.

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND
ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR
ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES
(INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR SERVICES;
LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON
ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT
(INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE OF THIS
SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
*/


routines (
           mark_regions
           main_suffix
           consonant_pair
           other_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 x )

groupings ( v s_ending )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef ao   hex 'E5'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'

define v 'aeiouy{a"}{ao}{o"}'

define s_ending  'bcdfghjklmnoprtvy'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    test ( hop 3 setmark x )
    goto v gopast non-v  setmark p1
    try ( $p1 < x  $p1 = x )
)

backwardmode (

    define main_suffix as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(

            'a' 'arna' 'erna' 'heterna' 'orna' 'ad' 'e' 'ade' 'ande' 'arne'
            'are' 'aste' 'en' 'anden' 'aren' 'heten' 'ern' 'ar' 'er' 'heter'
            'or' 'as' 'arnas' 'ernas' 'ornas' 'es' 'ades' 'andes' 'ens' 'arens'
            'hetens' 'erns' 'at' 'andet' 'het' 'ast'
                (delete)
            's'
                (s_ending delete)
        )
    )

    define consonant_pair as setlimit tomark p1 for (
        among('dd' 'gd' 'nn' 'dt' 'gt' 'kt' 'tt')
        and ([next] delete)
    )

    define other_suffix as setlimit tomark p1 for (
        [substring] among(
            'lig' 'ig' 'els' (delete)
            'l{o"}st'        (<-'l{o"}s')
            'fullt'          (<-'full')
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do main_suffix
        do consonant_pair
        do other_suffix
    )
)
